Maryland, session 2025, HB0219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–402.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or elsewhere in the
Maryland Vehicle Law, each motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer driven on
a highway shall be registered under this subtitle.
(2) If a motor vehicle required to be registered under this subtitle is not
registered, a person may not park the unregistered motor vehicle on any:
(i) Public alley, street, or highway; or
(ii) Private property used by the public in general, including parking
lots of shopping centers, condominiums, apartments, or town house developments.
(3) The provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection do not apply to a
motor vehicle that is exempt from registration under this section or § 13–402.1 of this
subtitle.
(c) Registration under this subtitle is not required for:
(7) A vehicle owned by a new resident of this State during the first 60 days
of residency provided the vehicle displays valid registration issued by the jurisdiction of the
resident’s former domicile;
26–301.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, any State agency authorized by law
and any political subdivision of this State may adopt ordinances or regulations that:
(1) Regulate the parking of vehicles;
(2) Provide for the impounding of vehicles parked in violation of the
ordinances or regulations;
(3) Regulate the towing of vehicles from publicly owned and privately
owned parking lots; and
(4) Provide for the issuance of a citation by an officer for a violation of an
ordinance or regulation that is adopted under this section.
(B–1) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE CITY.

HOUSE BILL 219 3
(2) BALTIMORE CITY MAY TOW, REMOVE, OR IMPOUND A VEHICLE
OWNED BY A NEW RESIDENT OF THE STATE WHO FAILS TO REGISTER THE VEHICLE
WITH THE ADMINISTRATION AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION WITHIN 60 DAYS AS REQUIRED UNDER § 13–402 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(B–1) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED FOR IN THE
MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW, IF THE ADMINISTRATION HAS PROBABLE CAUSE TO
BELIEVE THAT A VEHICLE OWNER IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE AND HAS FAILED TO
PROPERLY REGISTER THE VEHICLE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION AND DISPLAY
VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE VEHICLE,
THE VEHICLE OWNER IS SUBJECT TO A WARNING REQUIRING THE VEHICLE OWNER,
WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE WARNING, TO:
(I) PROPERLY REGISTER THE VEHICLE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION; OR
(II) PROVIDE PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT THE VEHICLE IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(2) (I) IF THE VEHICLE OWNER PROVIDES PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO
THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE VEHICLE IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED IN
THE STATE, IF APPLICABLE AS DETERMINED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, THE
VEHICLE OWNER SHALL OBTAIN AND DISPLAY ON THE VEHICLE A NONRESIDENT
PERMIT ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(II) IF, WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, THE VEHICLE OWNER FAILS TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE
VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE VEHICLE OR PROVIDE
PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION THAT REGISTRATION IN THE STATE
IS NOT REQUIRED, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ASSESS A CIVIL FINE AGAINST THE
VEHICLE OF $7 PER DAY FOR UP TO 60 DAYS OR UNTIL THE VEHICLE IS PROPERLY
REGISTERED AND DISPLAYING VALID REGISTRATION PLATES OR THE
ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT THE VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO
REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(3) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL NOTIFY THE APPROPRIATE
LOCAL JURISDICTION IF A VEHICLE OWNER FAILS, WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER
ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE
VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE VEHICLE OR SATISFY
THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN
THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 219
(II) THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY STATE’S ATTORNEY MAY
BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN REM AGAINST A VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE VEHICLE OWNER
FAILS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO PROPERLY REGISTER AND DISPLAY VALID
REGISTRATION PLATES OR TO SATISFY THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE VEHICLE IS
NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(III) IN A CIVIL ACTION IN REM BROUGHT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY STATE’S ATTORNEY MAY SEEK
IMMOBILIZATION OF THE VEHICLE BY TOWING OR REMOVAL AND IMPOUNDMENT,
OR BOOTING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.